Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201377-5709
Equivalent employees,
defined.

Equivalent employees means the number
of employees computed by dividing the total hours paid in a year by the product
of forty times the number of weeks in a year. A salaried employee who receives a predetermined amount
of compensation each pay period on a weekly or less frequent basis is deemed
to have been paid for forty hours per week during the pay period.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 31;

Laws 2013, LB34, § 2.